Hawaii statutes.
[PART
II.] FEE FOR ENHANCED SERVICES PROGRAM

Note

Part designation added by L 1993, c 327, §1 and amended by L
1993, c 327, §3; L 1996, c 144, §2; L 1999, c 29, §2; L 2001, c 107, §2.

§312-21 Fee for enhanced services program;
established. (a) The state librarian shall:

(1) Provide for the establishment and ongoing
operation of a fee for enhanced service program, which includes but is not
limited to the planning, programming, and budgeting of operating, research and
development, and capital investment programs; and

(2) Administer a special fund to be known as the "library
fee for enhanced services special fund".

(b) Notwithstanding sections 312-3.6 and
312-4, all moneys collected through the fee for enhanced services program shall
be deposited into the library fee for enhanced services special fund
established under section 312-22.

(c) The state librarian, with the approval of
the board of education, shall determine the types and kinds of enhanced
services to be included under the fee for enhanced services program; provided
that a schedule of fees for these enhanced services shall be adopted in
accordance with chapter 91. Libraries shall not be obligated to offer all of
the services specified in the fee for enhanced services program, and each
public library shall determine which services it will provide. [L 1993, c 327,
pt of §1; am L 2015, c 26, §8]

Note

Section 312-4 referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next